Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 431 General Provisions Concerning Crimes and Punishments
431.270.
Delivery or burial of body.

The body of the condemned shall be delivered to any friend or relative making request for it. The expense for the return of the body to its home, not to exceed thirty dollars ($30), shall be paid out of the appropriations to the Department of Corrections. If no request is made, the body shall be buried, and the cost of the burial, not to exceed thirty dollars ($30), shall be paid out of the appropriations to the Department of Corrections.

History.

1137-6: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 2; 1992, ch. 211, § 87, effective July 14, 1992.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Department of Corrections may have the body of an inmate buried where no one claims it, with the cost of burial not to exceed the sum set out in this section, to be deducted from the institutional account of the inmate.

OAG 70-645

.

431.350.
Consumer reporting agency records restriction — Penalty. [Repealed.]

431.400.
Summons to issue in case of accidental homicide by motor vehicle.

In the case of accidental homicide by motor vehicle, when no arrest is made at the scene of the accident and a complaint is later filed against the driver, the court shall not issue a warrant for the arrest of the driver unless there is reason to believe that the driver will flee to avoid a summons or unless circumstances within the discretion of the court require the issuance of a warrant. Instead of a warrant, a summons shall be issued and served upon the driver to have him appear for arraignment and plea at a certain time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 373, § 1.

431.410.
When issuance of summons is mandatory.

The issuance of a summons rather than an arrest warrant shall be mandatory for all offenses, except for violations of KRS

189.290

,

189.393

,

189.520

,

189.580

,

511.080

or

525.070

, which are deemed violations as defined in KRS 532.020(4) and traffic infractions for which a fine only can be imposed unless the judicial officer finds that:

The defendant previously has failed to respond to a citation or summons for an offense; or

He has no ties to the community and there is a substantial likelihood that he will refuse to respond to a summons; or

The whereabouts of the defendant are unknown and the issuance of an arrest warrant is necessary in order to subject him to the jurisdiction of the court; or

Where arrest is necessary to prevent imminent bodily harm to the accused or to another; or

For any other good and compelling reason as determined by the judicial officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 373, § 2: 1978, ch. 249, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 309, § 4, effective July 15, 1980.

431.420.
City police to serve warrant, when.

Any warrant issued by District Court for an offense committed within a city shall be served by the police department of that city if the warrant is to be served within the city limits.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 249, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.